hu_hu.affix
SFX E 0 ne [^tk]
SFX E 0 jünk [^sztk]
SFX E 0 jél [^sztk]
SFX E 0 jetek [^sztk]
SFX E 0 jenek [^sztk]
SFX E 0 jen [^sztk]
SFX E 0 jek [^sztk]
SFX E 0 j [^sztk]
SFX E 0 ettünk rr
SFX E 0 ettünk [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ettünk [ln]l
SFX E 0 ettünk [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX E 0 ettünk [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ettünk [gn]g
SFX E 0 ettél rr
SFX E 0 ettél [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ettél [ln]l
SFX E 0 ettél [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX E 0 ettél [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ettél [gn]g
SFX E 0 ettetek rr
SFX E 0 ettetek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ettetek [ln]l
SFX E 0 ettetek [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX E 0 ettetek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ettetek [gn]g
SFX E 0 ettem rr
SFX E 0 ettem [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ettem [ln]l
SFX E 0 ettem [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX E 0 ettem [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ettem [gn]g
SFX E 0 ettek rr
SFX E 0 ettek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ettek [ln]l
SFX E 0 ettek [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX E 0 ettek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ettek [gn]g
SFX E 0 etek rr
SFX E 0 etek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 etek [ln]l
SFX E 0 etek [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 etek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 etek [gn]g
SFX E 0 esz rr
SFX E 0 esz [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 esz [ln]l
SFX E 0 esz [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 esz [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 esz [gn]g
SFX E 0 enünk rr
SFX E 0 enünk [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enünk [ln]l
SFX E 0 enünk [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enünk [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enünk [gn]g
SFX E 0 enétek rr
SFX E 0 enétek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enétek [ln]l
SFX E 0 enétek [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enétek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enétek [gn]g
SFX E 0 enénk rr
SFX E 0 enénk [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enénk [ln]l
SFX E 0 enénk [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enénk [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enénk [gn]g
SFX E 0 enének rr
SFX E 0 enének [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enének [ln]l
SFX E 0 enének [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enének [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enének [gn]g
SFX E 0 enél rr
SFX E 0 enél [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enél [ln]l
SFX E 0 enél [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enél [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enél [gn]g
SFX E 0 enék rr
SFX E 0 enék [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enék [ln]l
SFX E 0 enék [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enék [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enék [gn]g
SFX E 0 eniük rr
SFX E 0 eniük [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 eniük [ln]l
SFX E 0 eniük [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 eniük [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 eniük [gn]g
SFX E 0 eniök/& rr
SFX E 0 eniök/& [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 eniök/& [ln]l
SFX E 0 eniök/& [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 eniök/& [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 eniök/& [gn]g
SFX E 0 enie rr
SFX E 0 enie [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enie [ln]l
SFX E 0 enie [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enie [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enie [gn]g
SFX E 0 eni rr
SFX E 0 eni [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 eni [ln]l
SFX E 0 eni [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 eni [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 eni [gn]g
SFX E 0 enetek rr
SFX E 0 enetek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enetek [ln]l
SFX E 0 enetek [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enetek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enetek [gn]g
SFX E 0 enem rr
SFX E 0 enem [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enem [ln]l
SFX E 0 enem [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enem [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enem [gn]g
SFX E 0 enek rr
SFX E 0 enek [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 enek [ln]l
SFX E 0 enek [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 enek [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 enek [gn]g
SFX E 0 ened rr
SFX E 0 ened [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ened [ln]l
SFX E 0 ened [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 ened [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ened [gn]g
SFX E 0 ene rr
SFX E 0 ene [lnrz]d
SFX E 0 ene [ln]l
SFX E 0 ene [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX E 0 ene [jdmn]z
SFX E 0 ene [gn]g
SFX E 0 el [sz]
SFX E 0 ek [^k]
