hu_hu.dict
üzletel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
üzemel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
üvegez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
ütemez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
üresedik/Ş¤EŹX
ülésezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
üledékesedik/Ş¤EŹX
ügyeskedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
üdvözít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
ötvenszerez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
összebalhézik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
örvendezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
öregedik/Ş¤EŹX	
öntözget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
önkényeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
ömleng/Ş¤EŹX
öltet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
ölelkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
öklendez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
öblöget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
őrjít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
őgyeleg/¤EŹdX	
ízlel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
ível/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
írásbelizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
ígérkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
étkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
észrevetet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
ésszerűsít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
érzékenyedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
érzeleg/¤EŹdX	
értéktelenedik/Ş¤EŹX
értet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
értekezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
érintkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
érint/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
érettségizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
érdemel/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
ér/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
énekelget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
émelyedik/Ş¤EŹX
éltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
élesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
éleszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
éldegél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
ékít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
ékez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
éjjelez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
éget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
édesget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
ébresztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
ébred/Ş¤EŹX	
züllesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
zörrentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
zörget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
zömít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
zökkentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
zárjelez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
zsémbel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
zsigerel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
zrízik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
zenél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
zeng/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
víztelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
víkendez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
vétet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
véset/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
vértez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
vérez/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
vénell/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
végtelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
véghezvihet/EeŹX)
védelmez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
vámmentesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
vizesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
vitet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
visszacsempész/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
vikszel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
viccel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
vezetget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
vetélkedik/Ş¤EŹX
vetkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
veteményez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
veszít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
veszteget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
veszekedik/Ş¤EŹX	
veselkedik/Ş¤EŹX
versengtet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
verselget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
veret/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
vereget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
vendégeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
vehet/EeŹX)
vedlik/ŞXEeŹ	
vedel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
utánvételez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tüzeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
tüsszentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
türemlik/ŞEŹX
tünedezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
tűzet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
tűret/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
törülget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
törvénytelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
törtet/Ş¤EŹX
törleszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
törekedik/Ş¤EŹX	
töpreng/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
töpped/Ş¤EŹX	
tönkremehet/EŹX)
töményít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
töltöget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
tökéletesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
többesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
tőkésít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
tévesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
téved/Ş¤EŹX	
tételez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
téret/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
térdel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tépet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
tép/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
távvezérel/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
tréningez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tiszteltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
tipeg/Ş¤EŹX
tetvez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tetszhet/EŹX)
tesztel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tesped/Ş¤EŹX	
tervel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
terpeszkedik/Ş¤EŹX
termesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
terjesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
terjeng/Ş¤EŹX
teremtettéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
terelget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
terebélyesedik/Ş¤EŹX
tenyésztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
tentikél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
temetkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
teljesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
telepít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
telekkönyvez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
tekintet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
tekereg/¤EŹdX	
tejel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
tegez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	
süttet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
süppesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
süpped/Ş¤EŹX	
süllyedezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
sűrűsít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
sötétlik/ŞEŹX
söpröget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
sérteget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szürkéllik/Ş¤EŹX
szüntet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szülemlik/ŞEŹX
szövöget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szövegel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szökken/Ş¤EŹX
szökdel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szögecsel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szóbelizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
színészkedik/Ş¤EŹX
színez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szépítkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szénkénegez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szélesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
széledezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szégyenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szégyell/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
számszerűsít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
számfejt/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
sziszeg/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szilveszterez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szeszélyeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
szerződtet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szertelenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
szerez/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
szerepez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szerencséltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szerel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szentségel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szennyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szenel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szemétkedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
személyesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szemrevételez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
szemez/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
szemereg/¤EŹdX	
szembesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szellemít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
szelet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
szekerezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
szegényedik/Ş¤EŹX
szeget/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
szeg/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
szedet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
szajréz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
stréberkedik/Ş¤EŹX
stencilezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
spriccel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
smirgliz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
skiccel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
sikerít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
settenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
serkentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
serked/Ş¤EŹX	
sercen/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
seper/Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
senyved/Ş¤EŹX	
selypít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
sekélyesedik/Ş¤EŹX
sejt/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
segélyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
seftel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
rühesedik/Ş¤EŹX
röstell/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
röptet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
röhögtet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
röffen/Ş¤EŹX
réved/Ş¤EŹX	
részesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
részegít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
résel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
rémisztget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
régiesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
rákövetkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
rokonszenvez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
rigliz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
rezzen/Ş¤EŹX
rezel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
revesedik/Ş¤EŹX
retten/Ş¤EŹX
reszkettet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
restelkedik/Ş¤EŹX
repked/Ş¤EŹX
repes/Ş¤EŹX
renitenskedik/Ş¤EŹX
rendszerez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
rendez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
remeg/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
rejtezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
recéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
püffesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
pöszéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
pöket/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
pöccintet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
pénzel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
pomádéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
pitiz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
piperéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
pikkel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
petél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
perselyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
perel/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
peng/Ş¤EŹX
pellengérez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
ottvesz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
növöget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
nőhet/EeŹX)
néptelenedik/Ş¤EŹX
nácizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
nyeset/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
nyerekedik/Ş¤EŹX
nyel/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
nincstelenedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
neveletlenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
nemezel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
neheztel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
nedvesedik/Ş¤EŹX
mézesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
mérgeskedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
mér/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
modernkedik/Ş¤EŹX
mezítelenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
meszez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
merészel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
mereszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
mentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
menesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
mellesedik/Ş¤EŹX
mekeg/Ş¤EŹX
manőverez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
löttyentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
lóversenyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
lépked/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
lélegzik/ŞEeŹX	
lécez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
liftezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
levelezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
leselkedik/Ş¤EŹX
lepet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
lendít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
leletez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
legyintet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
legeltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
lebzsel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
küzdet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
közömbösít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
közelít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
következik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kötvényez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
körülményeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
köpet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
könnyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
költekezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kísértet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
kísér/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kétszerez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
késztet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
késel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kérgesedik/Ş¤EŹX
kérdőjelez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
képzel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
képel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kényeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
kémel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kárörvend/Ş¤EŹX
krikettezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
koncertez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
kilencedel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kezeltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kevesbít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kettyint/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kerülget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kerget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
keres/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kepesztet/Ş¤EŹX
kenceficéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
keltez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
kellemetlenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
kegyeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
kedvetlenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
kebelez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
jöveszt/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
jégtelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
jelentkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
jegyzőkönyvez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
izeg/¤EŹdX	
irigykedik/Ş¤EŹX
intet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
indexel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
illeszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
ijesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
igyekezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	
idegenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
hüledezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
hörpentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
hőkezel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
hétszerez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
hitelesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
hint/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	
hever/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
hetedel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
hergel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
hencsereg/¤EŹdX	
helyszínel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
heherész/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
heged/Ş¤EŹX	
hangszerel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
görnyed/Ş¤EŹX	
göndörít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
gépesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
gyűret/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
gyöngéll/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
győzet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
gyepesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
gikszerez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
gerebenez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
gecizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX=
füttyentget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
füllesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
függesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
fösvénykedik/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
főzőcskézik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
fér/Ş¤EŹX
féltet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
fékez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
fizet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
fillérez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
feszeng/Ş¤EŹX
feslik/ŞEŹX
fentereg/¤EŹdX	
felületeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
felesel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
feledkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
feketézik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
fejteget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
fejesel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
fegyverkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
fed/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
feccsent/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
esztelenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
esteledik/Ş¤EŹX
erőtlenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
ernyesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
erjeszt/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
ereget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
eprész/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
enyészik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
engedelmeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
emlékezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	
emberesedik/Ş¤EŹX
eltökél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹ
ellenségeskedik/Ş¤EŹX
elegyít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
egértelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
egyezkedik/Ş¤EŹX
egyenetlenkedik/Ş¤EŹX
edzet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
e-zik/EŹX
düledezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
dönget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
döbbent/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX
díszeleg/Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
dinsztel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
dermesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX)
delejez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csücsörít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
csörrent/Ş¨Ś¤EeŹX	
csöppen/Ş¤EŹX
csökevényesedik/Ş¤EŹX
csévél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csippentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX
csilléz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csevetel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
cseszeget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
cserkel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
cserepez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csepereg/¤EŹdX	
csenevészedik/Ş¤EŹX
csempészik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
csalizik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
cikkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
ciceréz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
büntet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
böngész/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
bővít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
bérel/¨Ś¤˘EeŹd'X	
béget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
bizserget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
billeget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX
biceg/Ş¤EŹX
betegesedik/Ş¤EŹX
beikszel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX
bankettez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX
alulfizet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹy
